Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2443.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: ARTICLE 1 COMMERCE AND OFFICE OF CANNABIS MANAGEMENT FINANCE Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATIONS.new text end new text begin The sums shown in the columns marked "Appropriations" are appropriated to the agencies and for the purposes specified in this article. The appropriations are from the general fund, or another named fund, and are available for the fiscal years indicated for each purpose. The figures "2026" and "2027" used in this article mean that the appropriations listed under them are available for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, or June 30, 2027, respectively. "The first year" is fiscal year 2026. "The second year" is fiscal year 2027. "The biennium" is fiscal years 2026 and 2027. If an appropriation in this act is enacted more than once in the 2025 legislative session or a special session, the appropriation must be given effect only once. new text end new text begin APPROPRIATIONS new text end new text begin Available for the Year new text end new text begin Ending June 30 new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin 2027 new text end Sec. 2. new text begin DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCEnew text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Total Appropriation new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 42,442,000 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 43,093,000 new text end new text begin Appropriations by Fund new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin 2027 new text end new text begin General new text end new text begin 39,534,000 new text end new text begin 40,185,000 new text end new text begin Workers' Compensation Fund new text end new text begin 815,000 new text end new text begin 815,000 new text end new text begin Special Revenue new text end new text begin 2,093,000 new text end new text begin 2,093,000 new text end new text begin The amounts that may be spent for each purpose are specified in the following subdivisions. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Financial Institutions new text end new text begin 3,227,000 new text end new text begin 3,227,000 new text end new text begin (a) $400,000 each year is for a grant to Prepare and Prosper to develop, market, evaluate, and distribute a financial services inclusion program that (1) assists low-income and financially underserved populations to build savings and strengthen credit, and (2) provides services to assist low-income and financially underserved populations to become more financially stable and secure. Money remaining after the first year is available for the second year. new text end new text begin (b) $735,000 each year is for additional advisor and broker-dealer examiners. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Administrative Services new text end new text begin 11,643,000 new text end new text begin 12,321,000 new text end new text begin (a) $401,000 each year is for unclaimed property compliance. new text end new text begin (b) $353,000 each year is for information technology systems and cybersecurity upgrades for the unclaimed property program. new text end new text begin (c) $564,000 each year is for modernization initiatives for the unclaimed property program. new text end new text begin (d) $5,000 each year is for compensating the Real Estate Appraisal Advisory Board under Minnesota Statutes, section 82B.073. new text end new text begin (e) $23,000 each year is for preliminary licensing applications. new text end new text begin (f) $249,000 each year is for the senior safe fraud prevention program. new text end new text begin (g) $500,000 each year is to operate the Prescription Drug Affordability Board established under Minnesota Statutes, section 62J.87. new text end new text begin (h) $75,000 each year is for copper metal licensing and enforcement under Minnesota Statutes, section 325E.21. new text end new text begin (i) $12,000 each year is for the intermediate blends of gasoline and biofuels report under Minnesota Statutes, section 239.791, subdivision 8. new text end new text begin (j) $343,000 each year is for the common interest community ombudsperson established under Minnesota Statutes, section 45.0137. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Enforcement new text end new text begin 7,751,000 new text end new text begin 7,751,000 new text end new text begin Appropriations by Fund new text end new text begin General new text end new text begin 7,536,000 new text end new text begin 7,536,000 new text end new text begin Workers' Compensation new text end new text begin 215,000 new text end new text begin 215,000 new text end new text begin (a) $215,000 each year is from the workers' compensation fund. new text end new text begin (b) $225,000 each year is to operate the Mental Health Parity and Substance Abuse Accountability Office under Minnesota Statutes, section 62Q.465. new text end new text begin (c) $197,000 each year is to maintain a student loan advocate position under Minnesota Statutes, section 58B.011. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Telecommunications new text end new text begin 3,235,000 new text end new text begin 3,235,000 new text end new text begin Appropriations by Fund new text end new text begin General new text end new text begin 1,142,000 new text end new text begin 1,142,000 new text end new text begin Special Revenue new text end new text begin 2,093,000 new text end new text begin 2,093,000 new text end new text begin $2,093,000 each year is from the telecommunications access Minnesota fund under Minnesota Statutes, section 237.52, subdivision 1, in the special revenue fund for the following transfers: new text end new text begin (1) $1,620,000 each year is to the commissioner of human services to supplement the ongoing operational expenses of the Commission of Deaf, DeafBlind, and Hard-of-Hearing Minnesotans. This transfer is subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.281; new text end new text begin (2) $290,000 each year is to the chief information officer to coordinate technology accessibility and usability; new text end new text begin (3) $133,000 each year is to the Legislative Coordinating Commission for captioning legislative coverage. This transfer is subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.281; and new text end new text begin (4) $50,000 each year is to the Office of MN.IT Services for a consolidated access fund to provide grants or services to other state agencies related to accessibility of web-based services. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Insurance new text end new text begin 13,689,000 new text end new text begin 13,483,000 new text end new text begin Appropriations by Fund new text end new text begin General new text end new text begin 13,089,000 new text end new text begin 12,883,000 new text end new text begin Workers' Compensation new text end new text begin 600,000 new text end new text begin 600,000 new text end new text begin (a) $600,000 each year is from the workers' compensation fund. new text end new text begin (b) $136,000 each year is to advance standardized health plan options. new text end new text begin (c) $105,000 each year is to evaluate legislation for new mandated health benefits under Minnesota Statutes, section 62J.26. new text end new text begin (d) $42,000 each year is to ensure health plan company compliance with Minnesota Statutes, section 62Q.47, paragraph (h). new text end new text begin (e) $432,000 each year is for pharmacy benefit manager licensing and enforcement under Minnesota, Statutes, chapter 62W. new text end new text begin (f) $25,000 each year is to evaluate existing statutory health benefit mandates. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Weights and Measures Division new text end new text begin 2,897,000 new text end new text begin 3,076,000 new text end Sec. 3. new text begin LEGISLATIVE COORDINATING COMMISSIONnew text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 200,000 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin -0- new text end new text begin $200,000 in fiscal year 2025 is to the Legislative Coordinating Commission to provide administrative support to the task force on homeowners and commercial property insurance under article 2, section 5. Upon request of the task force, the commissioners of the Department of Commerce, Minnesota Housing and Finance Agency, and the Department of Employment and Economic Development must provide technical support and expertise. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2026. new text end Sec. 4. new text begin OFFICE OF CANNABIS MANAGEMENTnew text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 36,454,000 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 39,347,000 new text end new text begin (a) $14,258,000 each year is for cannabis industry community renewal grants under Minnesota Statutes, section 342.70. Of these amounts, up to three percent may be used for administrative expenses incurred by the Office of Cannabis Management. The base is $7,500,000 each year beginning in fiscal year 2028. new text end new text begin (b) $1,000,000 each year is for transfer to the CanGrow revolving loan account established under Minnesota Statutes, section 342.73, subdivision 4. Of these amounts, up to three percent may be used for administrative expenses incurred by the Office of Cannabis Management. new text end Sec. 5. Laws 2023, chapter 63, article 9, section 5, is amended to read: Sec. 5. OFFICE OF CANNABIS MANAGEMENT $ 21,614,000 $ 17,953,000 The base for this appropriation is $35,587,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $38,144,000 in fiscal year 2027. $1,000,000 the second year is for cannabis industry community renewal grants under Minnesota Statutes, section 342.70. Of these amounts, up to three percent may be used for administrative expenses. new text begin Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.28, the amount appropriated in fiscal year 2025 does not cancel and is available until June 30, 2026. new text end The base for this appropriation is $15,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 and each fiscal year thereafter. $1,000,000 each year is for transfer to the CanGrow revolving loan account established under Minnesota Statutes, section 342.73, subdivision 4. Of these amounts, up to three percent may be used for administrative expenses. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end ARTICLE 2 COMMERCE POLICY Section 1. new text begin [45.0137] COMMON INTEREST COMMUNITY OMBUDSPERSON. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the terms defined in this subdivision have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Association" means an association of apartment owners, as defined in section 515.02, subdivision 5, an association, as defined in section 515A.1-103, clause (3), and association as defined in section 515B.1-103, clause (4). new text end new text begin (c) "Common interest community" has the meaning given in section 515B.1-103, clause (10). new text end new text begin (d) "Governing documents" means a common interest community's declaration, articles of incorporation, bylaws, and any amendments thereto. new text end new text begin (e) "Unit owner" means an apartment owner, as defined in section 515.02, subdivision 3, a unit owner under section 515A.1-103, clause (20), and a unit owner, as defined in section 515B.1-103, clause (37). new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Establishment. new text end new text begin (a) A common interest community ombudsperson position is established within the Department of Commerce to: new text end new text begin (1) assist unit owners, their tenants, and associations in understanding their rights under chapter 515B and their governing documents; and new text end new text begin (2) facilitate the resolution of disputes between unit owners and associations. new text end new text begin (b) The ombudsperson is appointed by the governor, serves in the unclassified service, and may be removed only for just cause. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Qualifications. new text end new text begin The ombudsperson must be selected without regard to political affiliation, must be qualified and experienced to perform the duties of the office, and must be skilled in dispute resolution techniques. The ombudsperson must not be a unit owner, be employed by a business entity that provides management or consulting services to an association, or otherwise be affiliated with an association or management company. A person is prohibited from serving as ombudsperson while holding another public office. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Duties. new text end new text begin (a) The ombudsperson must execute the duties under subdivision 2, paragraph (a), by taking the following actions: new text end new text begin (1) creating plain language explanations of common provisions in governing documents; and new text end new text begin (2) identifying and providing resources and referrals related to the rights and responsibilities of unit owners and associations. new text end new text begin (b) Upon the request of a unit owner or an association, the ombudsperson must provide dispute resolution services, including acting as a mediator, in disputes concerning chapter 515B and governing documents, except where: new text end new text begin (1) a complaint based on the same dispute is pending in a judicial or administrative proceeding; new text end new text begin (2) the same disputed issue has been addressed or is currently in arbitration, mediation, or another alternative dispute resolution process; or new text end new text begin (3) the association notifies the ombudsperson that an order under section 609.748 is in effect against the unit owner. new text end new text begin (c) The ombudsperson must compile and analyze complaints received to identify issues and trends. new text end new text begin (d) The ombudsperson must maintain a website containing, at a minimum: new text end new text begin (1) the text of chapter 515B and any other relevant statutes or rules; new text end new text begin (2) a plain language explanation of common provisions of governing documents; new text end new text begin (3) information regarding the services provided by the common interest community ombudsperson, including assistance with dispute resolution; new text end new text begin (4) information and referrals regarding alternative dispute resolution methods and programs, and resources regarding the rights and responsibilities of unit owners and associations; and new text end new text begin (5) any other information that the ombudsperson determines is useful to unit owners, their tenants, associations, and common interest community property management companies. new text end new text begin (e) When requested or as the ombudsperson deems necessary, the ombudsperson must provide reports and recommendations to the legislative committees with jurisdiction over common interest communities. new text end new text begin (f) In the course of assisting to resolve a dispute, the ombudsperson may, at reasonable times and with 24 hours prior notice, enter and view premises within the control of the common interest community. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Powers limited. new text end new text begin The ombudsperson and the commissioner are prohibited from rendering a formal legal opinion regarding a dispute between a unit owner and an association. The ombudsperson and commissioner are prohibited from making a formal determination or issuing an order regarding disputes between a unit owner and an association. Nothing in this paragraph limits the ability of the commissioner to execute duties or powers under any other law. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Cooperation. new text end new text begin Upon request, unit owners and associations must participate in the dispute resolution process under this section and make good faith efforts to resolve disputes. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Landlord and tenant law. new text end new text begin Nothing in this section modifies, supersedes, limits, or expands the rights and duties of landlords and tenants established under chapter 504B or any other law. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 80A.58, is amended to read: 80A.58 SECTION 403; INVESTMENT ADVISER REGISTRATION REQUIREMENT AND EXEMPTIONS. (a) Registration requirement. It is unlawful for a person to transact business in this state as an investment adviser or investment adviser representative unless the person is registered under this chapter or is exempt from registration under subsection (b). (b) Exemptions from registration. The following persons are exempt from the registration requirement of subsection (a): (1) any person whose only clients in this state are: (A) federal covered investment advisers, investment advisers registered under this chapter, or broker-dealers registered under this chapter; (B) bona fide preexisting clients whose principal places of residence are not in this state if the investment adviser is registered under the securities act of the state in which the clients maintain principal places of residence; or (C) any other client exempted by rule adopted or order issued under this chapter; (2) a person without a place of business in this state if the person has had, during the preceding 12 months, not more than five clients that are resident in this state in addition to those specified under paragraph (1); (3) A private fund deleted text begin advisordeleted text end new text begin advisernew text end , subject to the additional requirements of subsection (c), if the private fund adviser satisfies each of the following conditions: (i) neither the private fund adviser nor any of its advisory affiliates are subject to a disqualification as described in Rule 262 of SEC Regulation A, Code of Federal Regulations, title 17, section 230.262; (ii) the private fund adviser files with the state each report and amendment thereto that an exempt reporting adviser is required to file with the Securities and Exchange Commission pursuant to SEC Rule 204-4, Code of Federal Regulations, title 17, section 275.204-4; deleted text begin ordeleted text end new text begin andnew text end new text begin (iii) the private fund adviser pays the fees under section 80A.65, subdivision 2b; or new text end (4) any other person exempted by rule adopted or order issued under this chapter. (c) Additional requirements for private fund advisers to certain 3(c)(1) funds. In order to qualify for the exemption described in subsection (b)(3), a private fund adviser who advises at least one 3(c)(1) fund that is not a venture capital fund shall, in addition to satisfying each of the conditions specified in subsection (b)(3), comply with the following requirements: (1) The private fund adviser shall advise only those 3(c)(1) funds, other than venture capital funds, whose outstanding securities, other than short-term paper, are beneficially owned entirely by persons who, after deducting the value of the primary residence from the person's net worth, would each meet the definition of a qualified client in SEC Rule 205-3, Code of Federal Regulations, title 17, section 275.205-3, at the time the securities are purchased from the issuer; (2) At the time of purchase, the private fund adviser shall disclose the following in writing to each beneficial owner of a 3(c)(1) fund that is not a venture capital fund: (i) all services, if any, to be provided to individual beneficial owners; (ii) all duties, if any, the investment adviser owes to the beneficial owners; and (iii) any other material information affecting the rights or responsibilities of the beneficial owners; and (3) The private fund adviser shall obtain on an annual basis audited financial statements of each 3(c)(1) fund that is not a venture capital fund and shall deliver a copy of such audited financial statements to each beneficial owner of the fund. (d) Federal covered investment advisers. If a private fund adviser is registered with the Securities and Exchange Commission, the adviser shall not be eligible for the private fund adviser exemption under paragraph (b), clause (3), and shall comply with the state notice filing requirements applicable to federal covered investment advisers in section 80A.58. (e) Investment adviser representatives. A person is exempt from the registration requirements of section 80A.58, paragraph (a), if he or she is employed by or associated with an investment adviser that is exempt from registration in this state pursuant to the private fund adviser exemption under paragraph (b), clause (3), and does not otherwise engage in activities that would require registration as an investment adviser representative. (f) Electronic filings. The report filings described in subsection (b)(3)(ii) shall be made electronically through the IARD. A report shall be deemed filed when the report and the fee required by sections 80A.60 and 80A.65 are filed and accepted by the IARD on the state's behalf. (g) Transition. An investment adviser who becomes ineligible for the exemption provided by this section must comply with all applicable laws and rules requiring registration or notice filing within 90 days from the date of the investment adviser's eligibility for this exemption ceases. (h) Grandfathering for investment advisers to 3(c)(1) funds with nonqualified clients. An investment adviser to a 3(c)(1) fund (other than a venture capital fund) that has one or more beneficial owners who are not qualified clients as described in paragraph (c), clause (1), is eligible for the exemption contained in paragraph (b), clause (3), if the following conditions are satisfied: (1) the subject fund existed prior to August 1, 2013; (2) as of August 1, 2013, the subject fund ceases to accept beneficial owners who are not qualified clients, as described in paragraph (c), clause (1); (3) the investment adviser discloses in writing the information described in paragraph (c), clause (2), to all beneficial owners of the fund; and (4) as of August 1, 2013, the investment adviser delivers audited financial statements as required by paragraph (c), clause (3). (i) Limits on employment or association. It is unlawful for an investment adviser, directly or indirectly, to employ or associate with an individual to engage in an activity related to investment advice in this state if the registration of the individual is suspended or revoked or the individual is barred from employment or association with an investment adviser, federal covered investment adviser, or broker-dealer by an order under this chapter, the Securities and Exchange Commission, or a self-regulatory organization, unless the investment adviser did not know, and in the exercise of reasonable care could not have known, of the suspension, revocation, or bar. Upon request from the investment adviser and for good cause, the administrator, by order, may waive, in whole or in part, the application of the prohibitions of this subsection to the investment adviser. Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 80A.65, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Registration application and renewal filing fee. Every applicant for an initial or renewal registration shall pay a filing fee of $200 in the case of a broker-dealer, $65 in the case of an agent, $100 in the case of an investment adviser, and $50 in the case of an investment adviser representative. When an application is denied or withdrawn, the filing fee shall be retained. A registered agent who has terminated employment with one broker-dealer shall, before beginning employment with another broker-dealer, pay a transfer fee of deleted text begin $25deleted text end new text begin $65new text end .new text begin A registered investment adviser representative who has terminated employment with one investment adviser must, before beginning employment with another investment adviser, pay a $50 transfer fee.new text end Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 80A.65, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 2b. new text end new text begin Private fund adviser filings. new text end new text begin A private fund adviser must pay a $100 filing fee when filing an initial or renewal notice required under section 80A.58. new text end Sec. 5. new text begin TASK FORCE ON HOMEOWNERS AND COMMERCIAL PROPERTY INSURANCE.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Establishment. new text end new text begin A task force is established to evaluate issues and provide recommendations relating to insurance affordability with respect to single-family housing, multifamily rental housing, common interest communities, cooperatives, and small businesses, and preventing disruptions or loss to the development, preservation, and long-term sustainability of Minnesota's housing infrastructure and small businesses. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Membership. new text end new text begin (a) The task force consists of the following: new text end new text begin (1) one member appointed by the commissioner of commerce; new text end new text begin (2) one member appointed by the speaker of the house; new text end new text begin (3) one member appointed by the speaker emerita of the house; new text end new text begin (4) one member appointed by the senate majority leader; new text end new text begin (5) one member appointed by the senate minority leader; new text end new text begin (6) one member appointed by the Minnesota Consortium of Community Developers; new text end new text begin (7) four members with expertise in property and casualty insurance and reinsurance for single-family and multifamily housing markets, including nonprofit and cooperative housing, appointed by the Insurance Federation of Minnesota; new text end new text begin (8) one member appointed by Big I Minnesota; new text end new text begin (9) one member appointed by the Minnesota Realtors; new text end new text begin (10) one member appointed by the Minnesota Community Development Financial Institutions Coalition; new text end new text begin (11) one member appointed by the Minnesota Homeownership Center; new text end new text begin (12) one member appointed by the Greater Minneapolis Building Owners and Managers Association; new text end new text begin (13) one member appointed by the Minnesota chapter of the Community Associations Institute; new text end new text begin (14) one member appointed by the Minnesota Multi Housing Association; new text end new text begin (15) one member appointed by the Housing Justice Center; and new text end new text begin (16) one member with climate science expertise appointed by the Legislative Coordinating Commission. new text end new text begin (b) The appointing authorities must make the appointments by August 15, 2025. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Duties. new text end new text begin (a) The task force must identify recommendations to strengthen and stabilize the homeowners and commercial property insurance industry. new text end new text begin (b) The task force must consult with the commissioners of the Minnesota Housing Finance Agency, the Department of Employment and Economic Development, and other key stakeholders in the homeowners and commercial property insurance and housing industries. new text end new text begin (c) The task force must review: new text end new text begin (1) risk mitigation methodologies; new text end new text begin (2) liability laws impacting insurance costs; new text end new text begin (3) minimum notice for coverage changes, including enforcement and oversight; new text end new text begin (4) public reporting of aggregated data relating to insurance plan costs and coverage; new text end new text begin (5) the reinsurance market for homeowners and commercial property insurance; new text end new text begin (6) the current state-supported insurance program and the potential to expand the program to include a catastrophic reinsurance fund and a self-insured pool; new text end new text begin (7) factors that increase claim costs, including but not limited to post-loss contractors, fraudulent claims, climate, inflation, and discontinued building materials; and new text end new text begin (8) other areas that would strengthen and stabilize the homeowners and commercial property insurance industry. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Meetings. new text end new text begin (a) The Legislative Coordinating Commission must ensure the first meeting of the task force convenes no later than September 15, 2025, and must provide accessible physical or virtual meeting space as necessary for the task force to conduct work. new text end new text begin (b) At the first meeting, the task force must elect a chair or cochairs from the members appointed by the house of representatives and senate by a majority vote of the members present and may elect a vice-chair as necessary. new text end new text begin (c) The task force must establish a schedule for meetings and must meet as necessary to accomplish the duties under subdivision 3. new text end new text begin (d) The task force is subject to Minnesota Statutes, chapter 13D. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Report required. new text end new text begin (a) The task force must submit a report to the commissioners of the Department of Commerce, Minnesota Housing Finance Agency, and the Department of Employment and Economic Development, and the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees having jurisdiction over the agencies listed in this paragraph by February 15, 2026. new text end new text begin (b) The report must: new text end new text begin (1) summarize the activities of the task force; new text end new text begin (2) provide findings and recommendations adopted by the task force; new text end new text begin (3) list recommended administrative changes to the relevant agencies; new text end new text begin (4) include draft legislation to implement nonadministrative recommendations; and new text end new text begin (5) include other information the task force believes is necessary to report. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Expiration. new text end new text begin The task force expires upon submission of the report required under subdivision 5. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end